Louisiana, session 2026, HB1255.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. 9:5625(A)(1), (3), and (4), (B), and (G)(3)(a) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 9:5625(A)(5) and (H) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§5625. Violation of zoning restriction, building restriction, or subdivision regulation
A.(1) All actions civil or criminal, created by statute, ordinance, or
otherwise, except those actions created for the purpose of amortization of
nonconforming signs and billboards enacted in conformity with the provisions of
R.S. 33:4722, which may be brought by parishes, municipalities, or their
instrumentalities or by any person, firm, or corporation to require enforcement of and
compliance with any zoning restriction, building restriction, or subdivision
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-3906 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1255
regulation, imposed by any parish, municipality, or an instrumentality thereof, and
based upon the violation by any person, firm, or corporation of such restriction or
regulation, must shall be brought within five years from the first act constituting the
commission of the violation.
* * *
(3) With reference to violations of use regulations all such actions, civil or
criminal, except those actions created for the purpose of amortization of
nonconforming signs and billboards in conformity with the provisions of R.S.
33:4722, must All actions, civil or criminal, related to violations of use regulations
shall be brought within five years from the date the parish, municipality, and the
properly authorized instrumentality or agency thereof if such agency has been
designated, first had been actually notified in writing of such the violation.
(4) If no map, plat, survey, or other instrument evidencing a violation of a
subdivision regulation imposed on a certain parcel of immovable property has been
filed or recorded in the conveyance or mortgage records of the parish in which the
immovable property is located prior to August 1, 2026, then the filing or recordation
of a map, plat, survey, or other instrument evidencing noncompliance with applicable
subdivision regulations shall not be the first act constituting the commission of the
violation for the purposes of the prescriptive period established in Subsection A of
this Section.
(4) (5) Except as relates to nonconforming signs and billboards, any Any
prescription heretofore accrued by the passage of two years shall not be interrupted,
disturbed, or lost by operation of the provisions of this Section.
B. In all cases where the prescription provided for herein has accrued, the
particular property involved in the violation of the zoning restriction, building
restriction or subdivision regulation shall enjoy the same legal status regarding the
violation as land uses, construction features of buildings or subdivisions made
nonconforming by the adoption of any zoning restriction, building restriction or
subdivision regulation. However, the governing authority may provide for the
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-3906 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1255
removal of nonconforming signs and billboards in accord with the provisions of R.S.
33:4722.
* * *
G.
* * *
(3)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection,
the prescriptive period set forth therein regarding any action to enforce a zoning
restriction or regulation or a violation thereof in the Vieux Carre section of the city
of New Orleans shall begin to run on the date the properly authorized agency of the
city actually receives written notice of the violation.
* * *
H. This Section shall not apply to actions created for the purpose of
amortization of nonconforming signs and billboards enacted in conformity with the
provisions of R.S. 33:4722.
Section 2. R.S. 33:5052 and 5053 are hereby repealed in their entirety.
Section 3. The Louisiana State Law Institute is directed to study the prescription of
actions to enforce zoning, subdivision, and land use regulations by political subdivisions in
light of the recent decisions in McCormick v. Ford (La. 5/9/2025), 408 So.3d 932, and
Bossier Parish Policy Jury v. Hicks, (La. App. 2 Cir., 11/19/2025), 425 So.3d 252, and
propose legislation that balances the public purpose of regulating land use and the right of
property owners not to be deprived of property without due process of law and just
compensation.
Section 4. The provisions of this Act shall have prospective application only.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-3906 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1255